Arkansas, session 2025, HB1249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the National Park College for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) President, NPC 1 $208,138
(2) IT Pool 15
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
*HAR003*
01/27/2025 11:03:27 AM HAR003

HB1249
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
01/27/2025 11:03:27 AM HAR003

HB1249
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(3) Chief Academic Officer 1 $167,057
(4) Chief of External and Adv. Programs 1 $156,658
(5) Chief Fiscal Officer 1 $156,658
(6) Chief Information Officer 1 $156,658
(7) Chief Workforce Development Officer 1 $156,658
(8) Chief Student Life Officer 1 $156,658
(9) Director of Human Resources 1 $132,733
(10) Director of Institutional Research 1 $132,733
(11) Counselor 2 $127,508
(12) Director of Marketing and Public Relations 1 $122,249
(13) Registrar 1 $122,249
(14) Director of Financial Aid 1 $122,153
(15) Dean of Students 1 $121,485
(16) Director of Major Gifts 1 $121,402
(17) Project/Program Administrator 20
Project/Program Director $120,919
Project/Program Manager $101,255
Project/Program Specialist $91,408
(18) Business Manager 1 $117,181
01/27/2025 11:03:27 AM HAR003

HB1249
(19) Controller 1 $117,181
(20) Director of Development 1 $113,455
(21) Director of Physical Plant 1 $113,103
(22) Assistant to the President 1 $104,457
(23) Workforce Specialist 2 $93,055
(24) Fiscal Support Pool 7
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(25) Accounting Coordinator 1 $85,136
(26) Maintenance Manager 1 $85,136
(27) Benefits Coordinator 1 $78,713
(28) Grants Coordinator 1 $78,713
(29) Payroll Services Coordinator 1 $78,713
(30) Academic Advisor 4 $78,705
(31) Academic Tutor 1 $77,184
(32) Student Service Representative 14 $77,184
(33) Maintenance Coordinator 1 $72,774
(34) HEI Program Coordinator 6 $69,975
(35) Administrative Support Pool 10
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(36) Assistant Registrar 1 $67,284
(37) Financial Aid Analyst 4 $67,284
01/27/2025 11:03:27 AM HAR003

HB1249
(38) Library Support Pool 2
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(39) Maintenance Supervisor 1 $67,284
(40) Purchasing Specialist 1 $67,284
(41) Student Recruitment Specialist 1 $62,208
(42) Maintenance Specialist 3 $59,815
(43) Maintenance Assistant 5 $51,130
(44) Institutional Services Supervisor 1 $43,706
(45) Institutional Services Assistant 11 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(46) Division Chairperson 3 $146,201
(47) Division Chairperson/Dean 3 $146,201
(48) Librarian 1 $132,733
(49) Director of Adult Education 1 $127,510
(50) Assistant Librarian 2 $81,202
(51) Lab Supervisor 3 $68,172
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(52) Faculty 115 $111,362
(53) Part-Time Faculty 110 $56,046
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(54) Athletic Director 1 $120,919
(55) Campus Store Manager 1 $104,892
(56) Athletic Administration & Support Pool 1
Coach $104,891
Asst. Coach $56,046
Athletic Trainer $41,956
(57) Retail Specialist 3 $53,175
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 380

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
01/27/2025 11:03:27 AM HAR003

HB1249
the National Park College for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: four
hundred two (402) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of
pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the National Park College, to be payable from the National
Park College Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
National Park College for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $8,796,704
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,300,000
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,350,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) FUNDED DEPRECIATION 26,175
(05) CONTINGENCY 573,644
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $12,046,523

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the National Park College, to be payable from cash funds as defined by
Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating expenses of the
National Park College for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
01/27/2025 11:03:27 AM HAR003

HB1249
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,100,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 1,000,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,250,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 7,020,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 150,000
(C) PROF. FEES 400,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 7,300,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) DEBT SERVICE 2,200,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $21,420,000

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
01/27/2025 11:03:27 AM HAR003

HB1249
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.





























01/27/2025 11:03:27 AM HAR003